Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-834
Inspection warrants; laws applicable.

All general laws pertaining to search warrants, including but not limited to the filing costs involved and the conditions and time for return, shall be applicable to inspection warrants, unless in conflict with sections 29-830 to 29-833.

Laws 1969, c. 231, § 5, p. 859.